Illinois, session 104th, HB5553.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Building Remedies to End Abusive Tear Gas and Harmful 6Exposures Act. 7    Section 5. Findings; purpose.8    (a) The General Assembly finds that: 9        (1) Illinois has a compelling interest in protecting 10    all persons within its territorial boundaries from 11    exposure to dangerous chemical agents that cause severe 12    pain, respiratory distress, permanent injury, and death. 13        (2) The deployment of chemical irritant agents, 14    including tear gas and pepper spray, poses serious public 15    health risks to Illinois residents and all persons present 16    in Illinois, particularly vulnerable populations, 17    including children, pregnant individuals, elderly persons, 18    and persons with pre-existing respiratory, cardiac, or 19    other medical conditions. 20        (3) Tear gas and other lachrymatory agents have been 21    associated with severe injuries including permanent 22    respiratory damage, miscarriages, vision impairment, 23    chemical burns, and death, and present unacceptable public   HB5553- 2 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    health risks when deployed in populated areas or enclosed 2    spaces. 3        (4) Unregulated pepper spray formulations may contain 4    concentrations of active ingredients and additional 5    compounds that cause injuries far exceeding their intended 6    temporary incapacitating effect. 7        (5) Illinois law enforcement agencies have 8    demonstrated that tear gas is unnecessary for effective 9    crowd control and public safety operations. Public 10    reporting indicates that since 2021, the Chicago Police 11    Department has emphasized crowd-management strategies that 12    avoid tear gas and successfully managed major events, 13    including the 2024 Democratic National Convention, without 14    resorting to tear gas or other lachrymatory agents. 15    (b) The purposes of this Act are: 16        (1) to protect all persons in Illinois from serious 17    injury caused by dangerous chemical irritant agents; 18        (2) to establish science-based public health standards 19    for chemical irritant agents; 20        (3) to prohibit the deployment of tear gas and other 21    lachrymatory agents that pose unacceptable public health 22    risks; 23        (4) to ensure that pepper spray formulations used in 24    Illinois meet rigorous safety standards; 25        (5) to provide comprehensive remedies for persons 26    injured by prohibited or unapproved chemical agents; and   HB5553- 3 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1        (6) to ensure even enforcement of public health 2    protections on behalf of affected communities. 3    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 4    "Approved formulation" means a pepper spray or oleoresin 5capsicum formulation that has received approval from the 6Department under this Act and for which approval is current 7and has not been suspended or revoked. 8    "Board" means the Chemical Agent Review Board established 9under Section 15 of this Act. 10    "Capsaicinoid content" means the total concentration of 11capsaicinoids, expressed as a percentage by weight, contained 12in a chemical irritant agent. 13    "Chemical irritant agent" means any substance, compound, 14or mixture designed, intended, or used to cause temporary or 15permanent incapacitation, pain, irritation, disorientation, or 16impairment through chemical action affecting the eyes, 17respiratory system, skin, or nervous system. 18    "Chemical irritant agent" includes, without limitation: 19        (1) any lachrymatory agent; 20        (2) oleoresin capsicum, pepper spray, and any 21    capsaicinoid-based irritant; and 22        (3) any compound, mixture, or formulation marketed, 23    labeled, or commonly known as tear gas, pepper spray, 24    mace, or chemical agent. 25    "Chemical irritant agent" does not include common   HB5553- 4 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1household products such as cleaning agents or personal care 2products not specifically designed, marketed, or intended for 3use as incapacitating agents. 4    "Deploy" means to release, discharge, dispense, spray, 5apply, or cause to be released any chemical irritant agent, or 6to use any device or mechanism to expose any person to a 7chemical irritant agent. 8    "Deploy" includes both direct application to a person and 9area dispersal that causes or is reasonably likely to cause 10exposure to any person. 11    "Department" means the Department of Public Health. 12    "Interested party organization" means a not-for-profit 13corporation, as defined by the General Not For Profit 14Corporation Act of 1986, or a labor organization, as defined 15by 29 U.S.C. 152(5), that: 16        (1) has as a significant part of its mission the 17    protection of civil rights, immigrant rights, civil 18    liberties, or public health; 19        (2) has provided services to or advocated on behalf of 20    communities in Illinois for at least one year before 21    bringing an action under this Act; and 22        (3) has members, clients, or constituents who reside 23    in or are present in this State. 24    "Lachrymatory agent" means any compound or substance 25designed or intended to cause lacrimation, eye pain, temporary 26blindness, or irritation of mucous membranes, and includes,   HB5553- 5 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1without limitation, tear gas, ortho-chlorobenzylidene 2malononitrile, chloroacetophenone, dibenzoxazepine, and any 3similar compound. 4    "Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, 5association, governmental entity or agency, or any other legal 6entity. 7    Section 15. Chemical Agent Review Board.8    (a) The Department shall establish the Chemical Agent 9Review Board within 90 days after the effective date of this 10Act. The Board shall consist of 11 members appointed by the 11Director of Public Health as follows: 12        (1) two members who are physicians licensed under the 13    Medical Practice Act of 1987, at least one of whom has 14    expertise in emergency medicine and at least one of whom 15    has expertise in pulmonology or toxicology; 16        (2) one member who is a toxicologist with expertise in 17    chemical exposure and public health employed by an 18    academic institution or research organization; 19        (3) one member who is a chemist with expertise in 20    analytical chemistry or chemical safety employed by an 21    academic institution or research organization; 22        (4) one member who is an attorney with expertise in 23    civil rights, constitutional law, or tort law; 24        (5) three members who represent community 25    organizations focused on immigrant rights, police   HB5553- 6 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    accountability, civil liberties, or public health 2    advocacy; 3        (6) one member who represents a municipal law 4    enforcement agency in Illinois; and 5        (7) two members of the public who have no financial 6    interest in the manufacture, sale, distribution, or use of 7    chemical irritant agents. 8    (b) In appointing members under paragraphs (5) and (7) of 9subsection (a), the Director shall prioritize individuals with 10expertise in or experience with communities disproportionately 11affected by chemical irritant agent deployments. 12    (c) Members shall serve 3-year terms and may be 13reappointed for one additional term. Initial appointments 14shall be staggered so that approximately one-third of members' 15terms expire each year. The Director shall designate a 16chairperson from among the Board members. 17    (d) Board members shall receive no compensation but shall 18be reimbursed for reasonable travel expenses and other 19expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their 20duties. 21    (e) The Board shall meet at least quarterly and at 22additional times the chairperson deems necessary. Six members 23shall constitute a quorum. 24    (f) The Board shall advise the Department on: 25        (1) scientific and medical criteria for evaluating 26    pepper spray formulations;   HB5553- 7 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1        (2) testing protocols and evidentiary standards for 2    approval; 3        (3) ongoing monitoring of adverse health effects 4    associated with approved formulations; 5        (4) review of new peer-reviewed scientific evidence 6    regarding chemical irritant agents; 7        (5) recommendations for revision of standards and 8    rules; and 9        (6) public health impacts of chemical irritant agent 10    deployments in Illinois. 11    (g) The Department shall provide adequate administrative 12and technical support for the Board, including staff, meeting 13space, and resources necessary to fulfill the Board's duties. 14    (h) All meetings of the Board shall be open to the public 15under the Open Meetings Act, except that the Board may meet in 16closed session to discuss pending litigation or proprietary 17information as permitted by law. 18    Section 20. Prohibition on lachrymatory agents.19    (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), no person shall 20deploy any lachrymatory agent in this State.21    (b) Except as provided in subsection (c), no person shall 22possess any lachrymatory agent in this State for the purpose 23of deploying the agent in this State. 24    (c) This Section does not apply: 25        (1) if the possession or transportation of the   HB5553- 8 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    lachrymatory agent is in the course of interstate commerce 2    and the agent is not deployed in this State; 3        (2) to possession by manufacturers, distributors, or 4    retailers in sealed containers in the ordinary course of 5    business, if the persons do not sell, transfer, or provide 6    lachrymatory agents to any person for use in this State; 7    or 8        (3) to possession of commercially available personal 9    defense devices containing lachrymatory agents in 10    quantities of less than 2 ounces for personal 11    self-defense, if the lachrymatory agents are not deployed 12    except in lawful self-defense. 13    (d) The prohibitions in this Section apply to all persons 14operating within or causing injury in this State. 15    Section 25. Department rulemaking for pepper spray 16approval.17    (a) Within 180 days after the effective date of this Act, 18the Department shall adopt rules, in consultation with the 19Board, establishing comprehensive standards for the approval 20of pepper spray and oleoresin capsicum formulations. The rules 21shall establish: 22        (1) the maximum permissible capsaicinoid content, 23    which shall not exceed 1.3% by weight unless an applicant 24    demonstrates by clear and convincing peer-reviewed 25    scientific evidence that a higher concentration is   HB5553- 9 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    necessary for legitimate law enforcement purposes and does 2    not present unacceptable health risks to the general 3    population or to vulnerable subpopulations; 4        (2) prohibited compounds, additives, propellants, and 5    carriers, including: 6            (A) UV marking dyes or any substance designed to 7        permanently mark or identify exposed individuals; 8            (B) any compound identified by the International 9        Agency for Research on Cancer, the National Toxicology 10        Program, or other recognized scientific authorities as 11        a known or probable human carcinogen; 12            (C) any compound identified by recognized 13        scientific or medical authorities as neurotoxic, 14        mutagenic, or a reproductive toxin; 15            (D) any propellant or carrier that independently 16        causes respiratory distress, chemical burns, or other 17        injury beyond the intended temporary incapacitating 18        effect of capsaicinoids; and 19            (E) any compound that impedes or delays 20        decontamination; 21        (3) mandatory testing protocols that applicants must 22    complete using protocols approved by the Department, 23    including: 24            (A) testing on the effects on individuals with 25        asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, and 26        other respiratory conditions;   HB5553- 10 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1            (B) testing on the effects on individuals with 2        cardiovascular disease; 3            (C) testing on pregnant subjects or, if such 4        testing is ethically prohibited, peer-reviewed 5        literature review and risk assessment regarding 6        effects on pregnant individuals and fetal development; 7            (D) assessment of long-term health consequences of 8        single and repeated exposure; 9            (E) testing regarding interactions with commonly 10        prescribed medications, including, but not limited to, 11        anticoagulants, bronchodilators, and cardiac 12        medications; 13            (F) testing regarding efficacy and safety of 14        decontamination procedures; 15            (G) environmental persistence and contamination 16        studies; 17            (H) testing regarding effects on children, elderly 18        persons, and persons with compromised immune systems; 19        and 20            (I) any other testing the Department determines is 21        necessary to assess public health risks; 22        (4) restrictions on delivery mechanisms that: 23            (A) permit only targeted stream delivery 24        mechanisms designed to affect a single individual; 25            (B) prohibit area dispersal systems, foggers, 26        aerosol clouds, and any delivery mechanism designed or   HB5553- 11 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1        reasonably likely to expose multiple persons 2        simultaneously; 3            (C) prohibit any delivery mechanism that results 4        in environmental contamination affecting persons not 5        directly targeted; and 6            (D) establish maximum discharge volume and 7        duration standards; 8        (5) application procedures, including required 9    documentation, testing data, chemical composition 10    disclosure, and certification by a qualified toxicologist; 11        (6) application fees, which shall not exceed the 12    Department's reasonable costs of review and shall not 13    create a barrier to smaller manufacturers seeking 14    approval; 15        (7) timelines for Department review, which shall not 16    exceed 180 days from receipt of a complete application; 17        (8) standards for approval, conditional approval, or 18    denial, which shall prioritize public health protection; 19        (9) requirements for annual recertification, including 20    submission of any new safety data and reports of adverse 21    events; 22        (10) procedures for immediate suspension of approval 23    upon evidence of serious adverse health effects not 24    disclosed or anticipated at the time of approval; and 25        (11) public access to information regarding approved 26    formulations, including a requirement that the Department   HB5553- 12 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    maintain a publicly accessible database containing 2    chemical composition, testing data, adverse event reports, 3    and approval status, subject to applicable trade secret 4    protections that do not impair public health and safety. 5    (b) In adopting rules under this Section, the Department 6shall prioritize the protection of public health and shall 7interpret any ambiguity in favor of greater protection for 8vulnerable populations. 9    (c) The Department may deny approval to any formulation if 10the applicant fails to provide adequate testing data, if the 11formulation presents unacceptable health risks, or if approval 12would be contrary to the purposes of this Act.  13    Section 30. Approved formulations database.14    (a) The Department shall establish and maintain a publicly 15accessible online database, updated within 5 business days of 16any change, that lists: 17        (1) all approved pepper spray formulations, identified 18    by manufacturer name, product name or designation, and a 19    unique approval number assigned by the Department; 20        (2) the capsaicinoid content and other active 21    ingredients in each approved formulation; 22        (3) the approval date and expiration date for each 23    approval; 24        (4) a summary of testing data supporting approval, 25    including key findings regarding safety;   HB5553- 13 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1        (5) any conditions, limitations, or restrictions on 2    the approval; 3        (6) the status of each approval, including whether the 4    approval is current, expired, suspended, or revoked; and 5        (7) a summary of any adverse event reports received 6    regarding each approved formulation. 7    (b) The database shall be searchable by manufacturer, 8product name, approval number, and approval status. 9    (c) Information in the database is public information, 10except as provided under this subsection. The Department may 11withhold specific manufacturing process information that 12constitutes a trade secret under the Illinois Trade Secrets 13Act, except that no information may be withheld if disclosure 14is necessary to protect public health and safety or to enable 15enforcement of this Act. 16    Section 35. Prohibition on deployment of unapproved pepper 17spray.18    (a) Beginning one year after the effective date of this 19Act, no person shall deploy any pepper spray, oleoresin 20capsicum spray, or other capsaicinoid-based chemical irritant 21agent in this State unless the specific formulation has been 22approved by the Department under this Act and the approval for 23the formulation is current and has not been suspended or 24revoked. 25    (b) Any person who deploys pepper spray in this State is   HB5553- 14 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1responsible for ensuring that the formulation deployed is an 2approved formulation. 3    (c) The prohibitions in this Section apply to all persons 4operating within or causing injury in this State. 5    (d) This Section does not apply to: 6        (1) possession or use of pepper spray by private 7    individuals in quantities of 2 ounces or less for personal 8    self-defense purposes only, if the use is otherwise lawful 9    and not in connection with employment or official duties; 10    or 11        (2) possession by manufacturers, distributors, or 12    retailers in sealed containers in the ordinary course of 13    business, provided that the persons do not sell, transfer, 14    or provide unapproved formulations to any person for use 15    in this State. 16    Section 40. Private right of action.17    (a) Any person who suffers injury in this State, including 18physical injury, respiratory distress, pain and suffering, 19emotional distress, or property damage, as a result of 20deployment of a chemical irritant agent in violation of 21Section 20 or 35 may bring a civil action for damages and 22injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction in 23this State. 24    (b) An action under this Section may be brought against: 25        (1) any person who deployed the prohibited or   HB5553- 15 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    unapproved chemical irritant agent; 2        (2) any person who ordered, directed, or authorized 3    the deployment of the prohibited or unapproved chemical 4    irritant agent; 5        (3) any agency, entity, or organization whose 6    employee, agent, or contractor deployed the prohibited or 7    unapproved chemical irritant agent while acting within the 8    scope of employment or agency; or 9        (4) any person who provided the prohibited or 10    unapproved chemical irritant agent to another person 11    knowing or having reason to know it would be deployed in 12    this State. 13    (c) Notwithstanding Section 2-1117 of the Code of Civil 14Procedure, defendants found liable under this Section are 15jointly and severally liable for all damages awarded. The 16trier of fact shall apportion fault among the plaintiff and 17all defendants for purposes of contribution, but apportionment 18does not limit the plaintiff's right to collect the full 19amount of the judgment from any defendant. 20    (d) In any action under this Section: 21        (1) The plaintiff need not prove intent, negligence, 22    or any culpable mental state. Deployment of a prohibited 23    or unapproved chemical irritant agent that causes injury 24    is a strict liability tort under this State's law. 25        (2) The affirmative defense of qualified immunity or 26    any similar immunity defense based on official capacity or   HB5553- 16 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    discretionary function is not available to any defendant. 2        (3) The plaintiff may recover: 3            (A) all actual damages, including medical 4        expenses, lost wages, pain and suffering, and 5        emotional distress; 6            (B) statutory damages of not less than $5,000 per 7        violation; each deployment that causes injury to a 8        plaintiff shall constitute a separate violation; if a 9        single deployment causes injury to a plaintiff on 10        multiple occasions or results in multiple distinct 11        injuries, each such occasion or injury may constitute 12        a separate violation; 13            (C) punitive damages, notwithstanding the 14        provisions of Section 2-102 of the Local Governmental 15        and Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, if the 16        defendant acted with reckless disregard for the safety 17        of others or with knowledge that the chemical irritant 18        agent was prohibited or unapproved; 19            (D) reasonable attorney's fees and costs, 20        including expert witness fees; and 21            (E) injunctive relief prohibiting future 22        violations. 23        (4) Causation is established if deployment of the 24    prohibited or unapproved agent was a contributing factor 25    in causing the plaintiff's injury. The plaintiff need not 26    prove that the prohibited or unapproved nature of the   HB5553- 17 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    agent was the sole or primary cause of injury. 2    (e) The statute of limitations for actions under this 3Section shall be 2 years from the date of injury, or 2 years 4from the date the plaintiff discovers or reasonably should 5have discovered that the injury was caused by a prohibited or 6unapproved chemical irritant agent, whichever is later, but in 7no event more than 5 years from the date of deployment. 8    (f) Venue for actions under this Act shall be proper in any 9county where: 10        (1) the deployment occurred; 11        (2) the injury occurred; 12        (3) the plaintiff resides; or 13        (4) any defendant resides or maintains a principal 14    place of business.15    (g) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to modify 16or limit defenses or immunities available under the Local 17Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, 18except as expressly provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph 19(3) of subsection (d) of this Section. 20    Section 45. Interested party organization standing and 21enforcement actions.22    (a) Upon a reasonable belief that any person or entity is 23in violation of Section 20 or 35, an interested party 24organization may bring a civil action in the county where the 25alleged violation occurred or where any party to the action   HB5553- 18 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1resides, in the name of the State or for the benefit of any 2impacted persons. 3        (1) No later than 30 days after filing an action, the 4    interested party organization shall serve upon the State 5    through the Attorney General a copy of the complaint and 6    written disclosure of substantially all material evidence 7    and information the interested party organization 8    possesses. 9        (2) The State may elect to intervene and proceed with 10    the action no later than 60 days after it receives both the 11    complaint and the material evidence and information. The 12    State may, for good cause shown, move the court for an 13    extension of the time to intervene and proceed with the 14    action. 15        (3) Before the expiration of the 60-day period or any 16    extensions under paragraph (2), the State shall: 17            (A) proceed with the action, in which case the 18        action shall be conducted by the State; or 19            (B) notify the court that it declines to take the 20        action, in which case the interested party 21        organization bringing the action shall have the right 22        to conduct the action. 23        (4) When the State conducts the action, the interested 24    party organization shall have the right to continue as a 25    party to the action subject to the following limitations: 26            (A) the State may dismiss the action   HB5553- 19 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1        notwithstanding the objections of the interested party 2        organization initiating the action if the interested 3        party organization has been notified by the State of 4        the filing of the motion and the court has provided the 5        interested party organization with an opportunity for 6        a hearing on the motion; and 7            (B) the State may settle the action with the 8        defendant notwithstanding the objections of the 9        interested party organization initiating the action if 10        the court determines, after a hearing, that the 11        proposed settlement is fair, adequate, and reasonable 12        under all the circumstances. 13        (5) If an interested party organization brings an 14    action under this Section, no person other than the State 15    may intervene or bring a related action on behalf of the 16    State based on the facts underlying the pending action. 17        (6) An action brought in court by an interested party 18    organization under this Section may be dismissed only if 19    the court and the Office of the Attorney General give 20    written consent to the dismissal and their reasons for 21    consenting. 22    (b) Any claim or action filed by an interested party 23organization under this Section shall be made no later than 3 24years after the alleged conduct resulting in the complaint, 25plus any period for which the limitations period has been 26tolled.   HB5553- 20 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    (c) In an action brought by an interested party 2organization under this Section, an interested party 3organization may seek the following relief: 4        (1) temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive 5    relief prohibiting violations of this Act; 6        (2) declaratory relief; 7        (3) civil penalties of not less than $10,000 per 8    violation. 9    For purposes of paragraph (3) of this subsection (c), each 10deployment of a prohibited or unapproved chemical irritant 11agent constitutes a separate violation. If a defendant has 12engaged in a pattern and practice of violations, the court may 13award enhanced civil penalties of up to $50,000 per violation. 14    (d) An interested party organization that prevails in a 15civil action under this Section shall receive: 16        (1) 20% of any civil penalties assessed, to be used 17    for enforcement activities, community education regarding 18    rights under this Act, and provision of services to 19    affected communities; and 20        (2) reasonable attorney's fees and costs, including 21    expert witness fees. 22    (e) The remaining 80% of any civil penalties assessed 23under this Section shall be deposited into the Illinois Human 24Rights Enforcement Fund established in subsection (c) of 25Section 50 of this Act. 26    (f) An interested party organization may recover for a   HB5553- 21 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1violation of this Act under this Section at the interested 2party organization's option, but may not recover under more 3than one Section. An interested party organization's action 4under this Section does not preclude any individual from 5bringing a private action under Section 40 of this Act. 6    (g) Venue for actions under this Section shall be proper 7in any county where: 8        (1) a violation occurred; 9        (2) the interested party organization maintains an 10    office; or 11        (3) any defendant resides or maintains a principal 12    place of business.  13    Section 50. Attorney General enforcement and Illinois 14Human Rights Enforcement Fund.15    (a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action to 16enforce this Act pursuant to the authority conferred by 17Section 6.3 of the Attorney General Act, including actions for 18injunctive relief, civil penalties, and restitution to 19affected persons. 20    (b) In an action brought by the Attorney General under 21this Section, the court may award: 22        (1) temporary, preliminary, or permanent injunctive 23    relief prohibiting violations of this Act; 24        (2) declaratory relief; 25        (3) civil penalties of not less than $10,000 per   HB5553- 22 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    violation; 2        (4) restitution to persons injured by violations of 3    this Act; and 4        (5) reasonable costs of investigation and litigation. 5    For purposes of paragraph (3) of this subsection (b), each 6deployment of a prohibited or unapproved chemical irritant 7agent constitutes a separate violation. If a defendant has 8engaged in a pattern and practice of violations, the court may 9award enhanced civil penalties of up to $50,000 per violation. 10    (c) The Illinois Human Rights Enforcement Fund is created 11as a special fund in the State treasury. Civil penalties 12recovered by the Attorney General under this Section and civil 13penalties deposited under Section 45 shall be deposited into 14the Illinois Human Rights Enforcement Fund. 15    (d) Moneys in the Illinois Human Rights Enforcement Fund 16shall be used, subject to appropriation, for the following 17purposes: 18        (1) investigation and prosecution of violations of 19    civil rights, human rights, and constitutional 20    protections, including, but not limited to, protections 21    under the Illinois Constitution, the Illinois Human Rights 22    Act, this Act, and any other statute or common law 23    doctrine protecting individual rights and dignity; 24        (2) restitution to persons injured by violations of 25    civil rights, human rights, and constitutional 26    protections, including, but not limited to, protections   HB5553- 23 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    under the Illinois Constitution, the Illinois Human Rights 2    Act, this Act, and any other statute or common law 3    doctrine protecting individual rights and dignity; 4        (3) public education regarding civil rights, human 5    rights, and constitutional protections, including, but not 6    limited to, protections under the Illinois Constitution, 7    the Illinois Human Rights Act, this Act, and any other 8    statute or common law doctrine protecting individual 9    rights and dignity; 10        (4) grants to community-based organizations for legal 11    assistance, advocacy, and education related to civil 12    rights, human rights, and constitutional protections, 13    including, but not limited to, protections under the 14    Illinois Constitution, the Illinois Human Rights Act, this 15    Act, and any other statute or common law doctrine 16    protecting individual rights and dignity; and 17        (5) support for medical treatment, mental health 18    counseling, and other services for persons injured by 19    violations of civil rights, human rights, and 20    constitutional protections, including, but not limited to, 21    protections under the Illinois Constitution, the Illinois 22    Human Rights Act, this Act, and any other statute or 23    common law doctrine protecting individual rights and 24    dignity. 25    (e) Actions brought by the Attorney General under this 26Section do not preclude private actions under Section 40 or   HB5553- 24 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1interested party organization actions under Section 45 of this 2Act. 3    (f) Venue for actions under this Section shall be proper 4in any county where a violation occurred or where any 5defendant resides or maintains a principal place of business.  6    Section 55. Reporting requirements.7    (a) Any person who deploys a chemical irritant agent in 8this State, other than for personal self-defense as permitted 9under this Act, shall report the deployment to the Department 10within 48 hours. The report shall include: 11        (1) the date, time, and location of the deployment; 12        (2) the chemical irritant agent used, including 13    manufacturer and product identification; 14        (3) the circumstances necessitating deployment; 15        (4) the number of persons estimated to have been 16    exposed; 17        (5) any known injuries resulting from the deployment; 18    and 19        (6) the name and contact information of the person 20    making the report. 21    (b) The Department shall maintain a public database of all 22deployment reports received under this Section, updated 23monthly. The database shall exclude personal identifying 24information of individuals exposed but shall include aggregate 25data on deployments, injuries, and agents used.   HB5553- 25 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    (c) Failure to report as required by this Section does not 2affect civil liability under Sections 40 and 45 of this Act but 3may be considered by a court as evidence of recklessness or 4disregard for public safety.5    (d) A report submitted under this Section is inadmissible 6against the reporting individual in any criminal proceeding, 7except in a prosecution for perjury or false statements made 8in the report. 9    Section 60. Home rule. The regulation and certification of 10chemical irritant agents and the creation of civil remedies 11for injuries arising from their deployment are exclusive 12powers and functions of the State. A home rule unit may not 13regulate or certify chemical irritant agents or create or 14alter civil remedies for injuries arising from their 15deployment. This Section is a denial and limitation of home 16rule powers and functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of 17Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 18    Section 65. Transition; compliance period.19    (a) The prohibitions under Section 20 concerning 20lachrymatory agents apply beginning 180 days after the 21effective date of this Act.22    (b) The prohibitions under Section 35 concerning 23unapproved pepper spray formulations apply beginning one year 24after the effective date of this Act.  HB5553- 26 -LRB104 19204 BDA 34222 b1    (c) The civil liability provisions under Sections 40 and 245 apply to all violations occurring on or after the dates 3specified in subsections (a) and (b).4    (d) Nothing in this Act affects civil liability under 5common law or other statutory law for deployments occurring 6before the applicable dates under this Section. 7    Section 90. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 8Section 5.1038 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)10    Sec. 5.1038. The Illinois Human Rights Enforcement Fund. 11    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 12severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.